California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) Federal matching funds shall be allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) for counties that have not established a local children’s trust fund and shall be transferred to that county’s existing children’s trust fund established by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Children’s Trust Fund. Nothing in this section shall prevent a county that has not established a local children’s trust fund from establishing a local children’s trust fund.

(d) Receipt by a county of any federal funds available for the purposes set forth in this section shall be contingent upon the provision of assurances that the county will provide to the Office of Child Abuse Prevention all information necessary to meet federal reporting mandates. Those information needs shall be identified by the department at the time federal funds are allocated.

(e) Moneys received by a county children’s trust fund from private voluntary contributions shall not be considered in the calculation of federal challenge grant allocations pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 502.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18967.

Money in the children’s trust fund of each county shall be used to fund child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention programs operated by private nonprofit organizations or public institutions of higher education with recognized expertise in fields related to child welfare. The designated commission shall establish criteria for determining those programs which shall receive funding. The commission shall accept all program proposals that meet criteria set by the commission, shall prioritize these proposals, and shall make recommendations to the board of supervisors as to those proposals which the commission feels should receive funding. The board of supervisors shall make the final decision as to which programs shall be funded. The county shall use no more than 5 percent of the amounts in the trust fund for administrative costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 722, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

18968.

In any county where the board of supervisors does not designate a commission to carry out the purposes of this article, pursuant to Section 18965, except for a percentage of the receipts necessary for purposes of collection, the amount collected for the surcharge upon birth certificates pursuant to Section 103625 of the Health and Safety Code shall be transferred by the local registrar or county recorder to the Treasurer for deposit in the State Children’s Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 503.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18968.5.

Amounts collected for the surcharge upon birth certificates pursuant to Section 103625 of the Health and Safety Code that would have been transferred by the local registrar or county recorder to the Treasurer for deposit in the State Children’s Trust Fund shall, instead, revert to the county children’s trust fund when the board of supervisors designates a commission to carry out the purposes of this article, pursuant to Section 18965.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 504.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18969.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund which shall be known as the State Children’s Trust Fund. The fund shall consist of funds received from a county pursuant to Section 18968, funds collected by the state and transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 103625 of the Health and Safety Code and Article 1 (commencing with Section 18701) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, grants, gifts, or bequests made to the state from private sources to be used for innovative and distinctive child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention projects, and money appropriated to the fund for this purpose by the Legislature. The State Registrar may retain a percentage of the fees collected pursuant
 to Section 103625 of the Health and Safety Code, not to exceed 10 percent, in order to defray the costs of collection.

(b) Money in the State Children’s Trust Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of funding child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention programs. The department may not supplant any federal, state, or county funds with any funds made available through the State Children’s Trust Fund.

(c) The department may establish positions as needed for the purpose of implementing and administering child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention programs that are funded by the State Children’s Trust Fund. However, the department shall use no more than 5 percent of the funds
 appropriated pursuant to this section, exclusive of the funds transferred to the State Children’s Trust Fund pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 18701) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for administrative costs. Administrative costs do not include the moneys allocated to the department to pursue public education about child abuse and neglect prevention and early intervention as described in subdivision (b) of Section 18703 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) No State Children’s Trust Fund money shall be used to supplant state General Fund money for any purpose.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Children’s Trust Fund provide for all of the following:

(1) The development of a public-private partnership by encouraging consistent outreach to the private foundation and corporate community.

(2) Funds for large-scale dissemination of information that will promote public awareness regarding the nature and incidence of child abuse and the availability of services for intervention. These public awareness activities shall include, but not be limited to, the production of public service announcements, well-designed posters, pamphlets, booklets, videos, and other media tools.

(3) Research and demonstration
 projects that explore the nature and incidence and the development of long-term solutions to the problem of child abuse.

(4) The development of a mechanism to provide ongoing public awareness through activities that will promote the charitable tax deduction for the trust fund and seek continued contributions. These activities may include convening a philanthropic roundtable, developing literature for use by the State Bar of California for dissemination, and whatever other activities are deemed necessary and appropriate to promote the trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 924)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18970.

(a) The department shall expend funds appropriated to it pursuant to Section 18969 for innovative local child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention programs operated by private nonprofit organizations or public institutions of higher education with recognized expertise in fields related to child welfare. These projects shall be joined to formal evaluation components.

(b) These funds may also be used for evaluation, research, or dissemination of information concerning existing program models for the purpose of replication of successful models.

(c) The Office of Child Abuse Prevention and those local commissions designated by the county boards of supervisors shall collect and publish the following data relevant to the state and local children’s trust funds:

(1) Descriptions of the types of programs and services funded by local and state children’s trust funds and the target populations benefiting from these programs.

(2) The amount in each portion of the state and local trust fund as of June 30 each year, beginning June 30, 1987, as well as the amount disbursed in the preceding fiscal year.

(e) (1) Funds shall be expended from the moneys appropriated to the State Children’s Trust Fund pursuant to Section 18969 of this code and Section 103590 of the Health and Safety Code to enable the Office of Child Abuse Prevention to annually collect and publish the data specified in subdivision (c).

(2) Funds may be expended from local children’s trust funds established pursuant to Section 18966 to enable those local commissions designated by the county boards of supervisors in accordance with Section 18966 to annually collect and publish the data specified in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 506.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18971.

Priority for funds transferred to the State Children’s Trust Fund pursuant to Section 18968 shall be given to funding child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention programs operated by private nonprofit organizations or public institutions of higher education with recognized expertise in fields related to child welfare in the county where the funds originated, and where the county board of supervisors has not designated a commission pursuant to Section 18965 and has not established a county children’s trust fund pursuant to Section 18966. The department may allow the funds for a small county to accumulate to a usable amount, or fund regional programs serving several small counties. The department shall establish criteria for determining which programs shall be funded. Applicants for funding shall submit proposals to the department in response to a request for proposals. If there is no acceptable response to the department’s requests for proposals from qualified public institutions of higher education or private nonprofit organizations in a county, then the department may use the funds from that county pursuant to Section 18970.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 466, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Citizen Review Panels [18973. - 18973.]

18973.

(a) Each citizen review panel established pursuant to Section 5106a(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall examine the policies, procedures, and practices of state and local child protective services agencies and, where appropriate, specific cases, to evaluate the extent to which the agencies are effectively discharging their child protection responsibilities in accordance with the state child and family services plan and the child protection standards set forth under Section 5106a(b) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and with relevant sections of this code and the Penal Code.

(b) A citizen review panel may review the extent to which the state child protective services system is coordinated with the foster care and adoption programs established under Part E of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.).

(c) A panel may examine any other criteria its members consider important to ensure the protection of children.

(d) Each panel shall be composed of volunteer members who are broadly representative of the community in which a panel is established, including members who have expertise in the prevention and treatment of child abuse and neglect, private citizens, former consumers of services, court-appointed special advocates, foster parents, children’s attorneys, law enforcement personnel, health and mental health professionals, substance abuse professionals, representatives from elementary and secondary education, representatives from higher education, mandated reporters, and representatives of tribal governments.

(e) The members and staff of a citizen review panel may not disclose to any person or government official any identifying information about any specific child protection case that is provided to the panel.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude a panel from releasing any information provided to the panel that will permit the panel to inform the public, a county child welfare services agency, a county board of supervisors, and other relevant agency concerning the panel’s progress, findings, and recommendations, if the information does not contain identifying information about any specific child protection case.

(g) A panel shall attempt to obtain case information that is free of data that reveals the identity of the recipients of service.

(h) A violation of subdivision (e) may be punishable by a civil fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. The Maxine Waters Child Abuse Prevention Training Act of 1984 [18975. - 18979.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [18975. - 18975.9.]

18975.

This chapter is known and may be cited as the Maxine Waters Child Abuse Prevention Training Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Child abuse and neglect is a severe and increasing problem in California. 

(b) School districts and center based preschools are able to provide an environment for training of children, parents, and appropriate school district staff. 

(c) Primary prevention programs in the school districts are an effective and cost-efficient method of reducing the incidence of child abuse and neglect and for promoting healthy family environments.

(d) To ensure comprehensive and effective primary prevention education to California’s center based preschools and public school children, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide adequate funding to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.2.

It is the intention of the Legislature that primary prevention training for all children in state-funded center based preschools and public schools, kindergarten through grade 12 be encouraged by the funding of appropriate agencies to provide the training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 2.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.3.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.4.

“Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.5.

“Office” means the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.6.

“Child abuse” means those acts defined in Section 11165 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.7.

A “primary prevention program” means a training and educational program for children, which is directed toward all of the following:

(a) Preventing the occurrence of child abuse, including physical abuse, sexual abuse, child neglect, and child abduction.

(b) Reducing the general vulnerability of children, including coordination with and training for parents and school staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1072, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.8.

“Prevention training center” means a center defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 18977).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18975.9 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 5.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.9.

“Center based preschools” means state subsidized centers in which children of preschool age are provided services under the child development programs identified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (h) of Section 8208 of the Education Code and the State Preschool Program identified in subdivision (dd) of Section 8208 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18975.10 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 6.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Primary Prevention Programs [18976. - 18976.5.]

18976.

A primary prevention program shall include all of the following:

(a) Parent, teacher, and children’s workshops which provide all of the following:

(1) Information, provided in a clear, age-appropriate, nonthreatening manner, delineating the problem and the range of possible solutions.

(2) Workshops which are culturally and linguistically appropriate to the population served and which are staffed by people with cultural and linguistic backgrounds representing the diversity of the population in the service area.

(3) Workshops which are appropriate to the geographic area served.

(4) Workshops which are designed to help counteract common stereotypes about victims and offenders.

(b) Parent and school staff workshops presented prior to the presentation of children’s workshops, which include information and training concerning all of the following:

(1) Physical and behavioral indicators of abuse.

(2) Postworkshop session techniques.

(3) Community resources.

(4) Rights and responsibilities regarding reporting.

(5) School district procedures to facilitate reporting and apprise supervisors and administrators of reports.

(6) Caring for a child’s needs after a report is made.

(c) Children’s workshops shall contain information and training concerning all of the following:

(1) The right of every child to live free of abuse.

(2) How to disclose incidents of abuse.

(3) The availability of support resources and how to obtain help.

(4) Child safety training and age-appropriate self-defense techniques.

(5) A period for postworkshop sessions in a school setting which maximizes the child’s privacy and sense of safety and provide a period of time following each child’s workshop, or a reasonable time thereafter, for any child who on a voluntary basis may want to individually talk with classroom presenters. Reports and referrals to appropriate child protective services agencies shall be made pursuant to state law. These sessions shall not provide any therapy or other forms of treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 920, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

18976.1.

For the purposes of program effectiveness, it is the intent of the Legislature that children’s workshops, in general, be delivered to classroom-size, or smaller, groups of children. It is further the intent of the Legislature that, in general, when services are delivered to a particular school, they be delivered throughout the school as a whole, with the exception that services may be delivered to kindergarten or special education classes, without necessarily delivering services to the entire school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 7.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18976.5.

Parents shall be given notice of, and may refuse to have their children participate in, a primary prevention program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 8.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prevention Training Centers [18977. - 18977.]

18977.

A prevention training center shall provide information and services to primary prevention programs, the office, and interested applicants for grants, as follows:

(a) Act as a clearinghouse to provide information on state-of-the-art prevention curricula which meet the requirements of this chapter.

(b) Assist in selecting a prevention program model, or a combination of program models, which will meet the needs of their communities.

(c) Design and administer training sessions to develop or expand local primary prevention programs.

(d) Provide technical assistance to local programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following: administration, management, evaluation, program development, development of multicultural staffing, and community education.

(e) Provide ongoing program development and in-service training to meet all of the following:

(1) The special needs of children, including, but not limited to, the needs of disabled and high-risk children.

(2) The geographic, cultural, and linguistic needs of the diverse communities of the state.

(f) Conduct an outreach program to inform communities of the existence of funds to conduct primary prevention programs.

(g) To act in an advisory capacity to the office to provide information for all of the following:

(1) The development of a standard request for proposal as described in Section 18978.2.

(2) Suggestions of appropriate agencies to receive the request for proposal. 

(3) The determination of, if requested, a current needs assessment for the number of projects needed to serve a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. The Office of Child Abuse Prevention [18978. - 18978.8.]

18978.

The office shall select and award grants by January 1, 1985, to two private, nonprofit prevention training centers, one located in, and serving northern California, and one located in, and serving southern California. The dividing line for the purposes of this act shall be the county boundary lines between Monterey, Kings, Tulare, and Inyo Counties to the north, and San Luis Obispo, Kern, and San Bernardino Counties to the south.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.1.

The office shall select the two training centers which can fulfill the requirement of Section 18977, and which meet the following requirements:

(a) For the northern California training center, the grant shall be awarded to the applicant which has demonstrated experience and expertise in administering a prevention training center and which has demonstrated the following:

(1) Provided training and ongoing technical assistance for the greatest number of primary prevention programs as defined in Section 18975.7 in school districts and preschools.

(2) Trained and employed the greatest number of trainers with experience in providing primary prevention programs.

(3) Employed trainers representing the cultural and geographical diversity of the service area.

(b) For the southern California training center the grant shall be awarded to the applicant which demonstrates the following:

(1) Experience in child abuse prevention training.

(2) Capacity for training of primary child abuse prevention programs as defined in Section 18976.

(3) Broad community support.

(4) Capability for developing staffing which represents the cultural diversity of their service area and a plan for developing this staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 9.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.2.

The office shall distribute a standard request for proposal and shall select the primary prevention program for each service area through a competitive bidding process. Grants for programs in each county shall be determined on a proportional basis according to the number of children in center based preschools and in the schools, kindergarten through 12th grade, except that allocations for primary prevention programs in any one county shall not be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The proposals shall include a plan by the applicant as to how its program will serve children in the service area, including all of the following information:

(a) How many children will be served each year.

(b) How each school in the service area is to be served so that children receive age-appropriate training in preschool, once during kindergarten, and at least three times during a child’s school career in grades 1 through 12. Any plan proposing to deliver services in a manner other than that contained in Section 18976.1 shall provide justification for the necessity to use an alternate service delivery method. The office shall consider the alternate proposed delivery method in the review of proposals.

(c) How multicultural staffing will be developed, including plans for the hiring and training of staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 10.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.3.

In awarding grants for primary prevention programs, the office:

(a) May, in order to achieve economies of scale, designate service areas for grants that include more than one county. Should acceptable applicants from more than one county in such a multicounty service area submit proposals, the office may separate the area into as many counties for service delivery as is appropriate. The office may also designate more than one service area in large counties and counties with large school-age populations.

(b) Shall award grants only to those qualified applicants set forth below and in the following order of priority:

(1) Private, nonprofit, and public primary prevention programs with experience in the county to be served that meet the requirements of Sections 18975.7 and 18976 by October 1, 1984.

(2) Private, nonprofit, community organizations based in the county to be served.

(3) Public institutions based in counties which do not have qualified organizations as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(4) Private, nonprofit community organizations in adjacent counties.

(5) Public institutions based in adjacent counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 11.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.4.

(a) Requests for proposals shall be sent out by March 1, 1985.

(b) The office shall so conduct its primary prevention program selection process that the selected programs are prepared to provide required training during the 1985–1986 school year. Requests for proposals shall be sent out as soon as possible, and at least 30 calendar days shall be allowed for submission of proposals for the competitive bidding.

(c) In accordance with Section 18979, no selected primary prevention program may commence operations prior to July 1, 1985.

(d) In order to ensure that primary prevention programs can provide training beginning in the 1985–86 school year, the office shall give priority in the processing of applications, execution of grants, and issuance of funds to those applicants who apply and qualify under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 18978.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 134, Sec. 12.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.5.

The office shall do all of the following:

(a) Prepare and execute grants with the successful applicants for the prevention training centers and primary prevention programs.

(b) Monitor and evaluate primary prevention programs and prevention training centers.

(c) Notify any local child abuse prevention council when a primary prevention program grant award has been made in its service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.6.

The office shall administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.7.

The director shall be authorized to the extent necessary to adopt regulations, orders, or standards of general application to implement, interpret, or make specific the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

18978.8.

The director shall, within 60 days of the operative date of this chapter, adopt regulations implementing the provisions of this chapter as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1638, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Fiscal Provisions [18979. - 18979.]

18979.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, eleven million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($11,250,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the office for the purposes of this chapter, to be allocated as follows:

(a) Eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000) for the establishment of prevention training centers and for administrative costs of the department, to be allocated for the period commencing January 1, 1985, and ending June 30, 1985, as follows:

(1) Four hundred eighty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($487,500) for startup and operating of the prevention training centers, to be allocated as follows:

(A) Two hundred eighteen thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($218,750) for the northern California prevention training center.

(B) Two hundred sixty-eight thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($268,750) for the southern California prevention training center.

(2) Three hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($362,500) for administrative costs of the department.

(3) Any unexpended allocations pursuant to this subdivision for the 1984–85 fiscal year shall be carried forward for the 1985–86 fiscal year.

(b) Ten million four hundred thousand dollars ($10,400,000) for the continuation of the prevention training centers, primary prevention programs, and administrative costs to be allocated for the 1985–86 fiscal year, as follows:

(1) Nine million five hundred thousand dollars ($9,500,000) for the operating costs of primary prevention programs. Funding for the primary prevention programs shall be maintained at a level at least equal to the amount allocated in the Budget Act of 1987, at least until June 30, 1989, or until the State Department of Social Services completes the evaluation of this program required by Section 18978.5, whichever occurs later.

(2) Seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) for the operating costs of the prevention training centers, to be allocated as follows:

(A) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for the northern California prevention training center.

(B) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for the southern California prevention training center.

(3) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for administrative costs of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1310, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. Child Abuse Prevention Coordinating Council Act [18980. - 18983.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18980. - 18981.1.]

18980.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Child Abuse Prevention Coordinating Council Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18981.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Child abuse is one of the most tragic social and criminal justice issues of our times.

(b) Victims of child abuse and their families face a complex intervention system involving many professionals and agencies.

(c) Coordination by child protection agencies and personnel improves the response to a victim and his or her family.

(d) The prevention of child abuse requires the involvement of the entire community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18981.1.

It is the intention of the Legislature to fund child abuse prevention coordinating councils in each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Child Abuse Prevention Coordinating Councils [18982. - 18982.4.]

18982.

A child abuse prevention coordinating council is a community council whose primary purpose is to coordinate the community’s efforts to prevent and respond to child abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18982.1.

Councils funded by this chapter shall encourage representatives from the following:

(a) Public child welfare services, including the following:

(1) The county welfare or children’s services department.

(2) The probation department.

(3) Licensing agencies.

(b) The criminal justice system, including the following:

(1) Law enforcement.

(2) The office of the district attorney.

(3) The courts.

(4) The coroner.

(c) Prevention and treatment services communities, including the following:

(1) Medical and mental health services.

(2) Community-based social services.

(3) Public and private schools.

(d) Community representatives, including the following:

(1) Community volunteers.

(2) Civic organizations.

(3) The religious community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18982.2.

The functions of a council shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) To provide a forum for interagency cooperation and coordination in the prevention, detection, treatment, and legal processing of child abuse cases.

(b) To promote public awareness of the abuse and neglect of children and the resources available for intervention and treatment.

(c) To encourage and facilitate training of professionals in the detection, treatment, and prevention of child abuse and neglect.

(d) To recommend improvements in services to families and victims.

(e) To encourage and facilitate community support for child abuse and neglect programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18982.3.

Councils may form committees to carry out specific functions, such as the following:

(a) Interagency coordination committees.

(b) Multidisciplinary personnel teams.

(c) Professional training committees.

(d) Public awareness committees.

(e) Service improvement committees.

(f) Advocacy committees.

(g) Fundraising committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18982.4.

The multidisciplinary personnel team provisions of subdivision (l) of Section 5328, subdivision (d) of Section 18951, and Section 18961 shall apply to child abuse prevention coordinating councils funded under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Selection and Administration [18983. - 18983.8.]

18983.

Each county shall fund child abuse prevention coordinating councils which meet the criteria in Section 18982 from the county’s children’s trust fund. In the event that the county does not create a children’s trust fund, the board of supervisors shall apply for funds from the State Children’s Trust Fund. Initial funding of councils shall be scheduled to accommodate ongoing funding of programs or funds already encumbered for other purposes.

Funds for councils selected pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered administrative costs for purposes of Sections 18967 and 18969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18983.3.

In the event that more than one council per county exists, the county board of supervisors shall develop a procedure for selecting a council for funding. More than one existing council may be funded in counties with geographically distinct population centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18983.4.

For counties without existing councils the county board of supervisors shall make every effort to facilitate the formation and funding of a council in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18983.5.

Councils funded under this chapter shall be incorporated as nonprofit corporations, or established as independent organizations within county government, or comparably independent organizations as determined by the office. New or existing councils may apply for funds using a fiscal agent pending incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18983.6.

Councils receiving funding under this chapter shall develop a protocol for interagency coordination and provide yearly reports to the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

18983.8.

Councils receiving funding under this chapter shall provide a local cash or in-kind match of 3313 percent. For councils unable to raise the full match for the maximum allocation, a partial grant shall be provided in the amount of three grant dollars to each match dollar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.8. Interagency Children’s Services Act [18986. - 18986.30.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provision and Definitions [18986. - 18986.3.]

18986.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Presley-Brown Interagency Children’s Services Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18986.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) According to Policy Analysis of California Education (PACE):

(1) In 1988, California had a population of 7.4 million children; by the year 2000, the population of California’s children will rise to 8.7 million, a 22-percent increase; California’s share of children increased from one out of nine in the United States to one out of eight. By 1995, California school enrollment will equal the total enrollment of the 24 smallest states.

(2) (A) California’s children are becoming more linguistically, culturally, and ethnically diverse. A majority of California’s children are now minorities and the fastest growing are Hispanics and Asians.

(B) By the year 2000, 42 percent of the children in California will be Caucasian, 13 percent will be Asian, 36 percent will be Hispanic, and 9 percent will be Black.

(C) One-fourth of California school children speak a language other than English at home.

(3) The number of immigrant children in California is the largest of any state and that number is growing. California receives 27 percent of the nation’s immigrants but has only 11 percent of the nation’s population. The experience of immigrants from different cultures will vary and requires different public policies.

(4) Since 1980, the number of children in poverty in California has increased 50 percent and is now 23 percent above the national average. Poverty is associated with numerous problems, including low educational performance, poor nutrition, child abuse, and delinquency.
